Washington statutes.
RCW 6.23.080

Redemption procedure—Certificate to be recorded—Evidence of right to redeem.

(1) The person seeking to redeem shall give the sheriff at least five days' written notice of intention to apply to the sheriff for that purpose. It shall be the duty of the sheriff to notify the purchaser or redemptioner, as the case may be, or the purchaser's or redemptioner's attorney, of the receipt of such notice, if such person is within such county. At the time specified in such notice, the person seeking to redeem may do so by paying to the sheriff the sum required. The sheriff shall give the person redeeming a certificate stating the sum paid on redemption, from whom redeemed, the date thereof and a description of the property redeemed. A certificate of redemption must be filed and recorded in the office of the recording officer of the county in which the property is situated, and the recording officer must note the record thereof in the margin of the record of the certificate of sale.

(2) A person seeking to redeem shall submit to the sheriff the evidence of the right to redeem, as follows:

(a) A lien creditor shall submit a copy of the docket of the judgment or decree under which the right to redeem is claimed, certified by the clerk of the court where such judgment or decree is docketed; or the holder of a mortgage or deed of trust shall submit the certificate of the record thereof together with an affidavit, verified by the holder or agent, showing the amount then actually due thereon.

(b) An assignee shall submit a copy of any assignment necessary to establish the claim, verified by the affidavit of the assignee or agent, showing the amount then actually due on the judgment, decree, deed of trust, or mortgage.

(3) If the redemptioner or purchaser has a lien prior to that of the lien creditor seeking to redeem, such redemptioner or purchaser shall submit to the sheriff the same kind of evidence thereof as is required from a person seeking to redeem under subsection (2) of this section, and the amount due thereon, or the same may be disregarded.

(4) A purchaser who has paid a sum on a prior lien or obligation secured by an interest in the property shall submit to the sheriff an affidavit, verified by the purchaser or an agent, showing the amount paid on the prior lien or obligation, or the prior lien or obligation may be disregarded.

[ 1987 c 442 s 708; 1984 c 276 s 6; 1899 c 53 s 12; RRS s 599. Formerly RCW 6.24.180.]

NOTES:

Application—1984 c 276: See note following RCW 6.21.020.